Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4083.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5107. (1) Except as otherwise provided under this act, a person who that violates any a provision of this act or rules promulgated under this act a rule is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, by a fine of not less than $250.00 or more than $2,500.00, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or both. (2) Notwithstanding the any other provisions provision of this act, a person who that knowingly violates section 5101(1)(b) or (l) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000.00 plus twice the amount of any economic benefit associated with the violation, or both. (3) A person that violates section 7129(7) is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 30 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (4) (3) If a violation results in a conviction under this act, the court shall assess against the defendant the costs of the department's investigation. The assessment for costs of investigation shall must be deposited into the dairy and food safety fund created in section 4117 for the enforcement of this act. Sec. 7129. (1) If a food is subject to a standard established under this chapter, it shall the food must be identified by the name required by that standard. If no a standard applies, does not apply, the product shall must be identified by its the product's common or usual name. If no a common or usual name exists, does not exist, the product shall must be identified by an appropriately descriptive name that is not misleading and that accurately identifies or describes, in as simple and direct terms as possible, the basic nature of the food and its characterizing ingredients or properties. A product manufactured or sold under the provisions of this act , which that is sold in a closed or sealed packages shall package must bear a complete label. The label shall bear the must state all of the following: (a) The true name of the product as defined in this act. , an (b) An ingredient statement, if the product contains more than 1 ingredient. , the (c) The net weight of the product. , and the (d) The name and address of the manufacturer. (2) Products A product sold from a bulk retail displays shall bear display must have a sign or placard containing that contains the true and approved name of the product. If the product contains more than 1 ingredient, an ingredient statement shall must be placarded, posted, or otherwise available for the customer in written form. (3) Meat products using A meat product that uses antioxidants shall must indicate on the label, or in the absence of a label, an adjacent placard, their the presence and purpose of the antioxidants in the meat product. (4) Meat products containing A meat product that contains monosodium glutamate, hydrolyzed vegetable protein, or any other source of monosodium glutamate shall must indicate on the label or, in the absence of a label, an adjacent placard, in its presence.the presence of those substances in the meat product. (5) The meat ingredients in a meat product that specifies 1 type of meat in its name, such as including, but not limited to, ham loaf, pork loaf, veal patties, or turkey sausage, shall must be entirely from the species indicated in the product name. The meat in a meat product that specifies more than 1 type of meat in its name, such as including, but not limited to, beef and turkey sausage, shall must be entirely from the types of meat indicated, and shall must contain at least 20% of each meat. A meat product that contains a type of meat consisting of less than 20% of that meat may be labeled as "(product) _____ added" or "product with _____", inserting the common name of that meat. Sausage labeled or advertised as all meat or all beef shall must not contain any nonfat dry milk solids or dry whole milk. (6) All required words and numbers shall must be legible to potential customers. (7) A person shall not manufacture for sale or offer or expose for sale cultivated meat. As used in this subsection, "cultivated meat" means a meat or meat product that was produced from cultured animal tissue produced from in vitro animal cell cultures outside of the animal from which the cells were derived.